Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-563.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-563.03. Turf and plant installation requirements; prohibition; exception; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, a municipality that is located in an initial active management area may not adopt or enforce any requirement that establishes, directly or indirectly, any either of the following: 1. Minimum turf requirements, except for functional turf requirements that are associated with public recreational use areas or other public spaces that are regularly used for civic, community or recreational purposes, including playgrounds, sports fields, cemeteries, schoolyards and stormwater management, but not including stormwater drainage areas that are located in subdivisions. 2. The installation of plants that are not included on the low-water-use low water use and drought-tolerant drought tolerant plant list that is published by the department for the current management plan in the initial active management areas.  The department may not include any species of mesquite on the low water use and drought tolerant plant list. B. For the purposes of this section, "subdivision" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-2101.END_STATUTE